Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-6122
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-6122 to 44-6144 shall be known and may be cited as the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 259, § 13;

Laws 2005, LB 119, § 22;

Laws 2026, LB967, § 8.
July 18, 2026